North Carolina, session 2025, SB742.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in non-recurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to The C.W. Williams Community
Health Center, Inc., a nonprofit organization, to assist in the completion of its full-service
community health center located in Mecklenburg County.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S742-v-1*